Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 2. Public Recreational Use Easements.

Sec. 34.17.100.
Public recreational use easements.

A public recreational use easement may be created for the purposes of AS

09.65.202

by recording the grant of the easement in the recorder’s office for the recording district where the land affected by the easement is located. The grant of the public recreational use easement must

be on a form provided by the Department of Natural Resources;

identify the land affected;

set out restrictions, conditions, or reservations affecting the easement, including terms addressing duration or termination of the easement, if any; and

state that the purpose of the easement is to make the land available for public recreational activity.

The easement granted under (a) of this section may be a conservation easement under AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

(Uniform Conservation Easement Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 2008)